Hawaii statutes.
[§489P-2] Definitions. When used in
this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Consumer credit reporting agency" or
"consumer reporting agency" means any person who, for monetary fees
or dues or on a cooperative nonprofit basis, regularly engages in whole or in
part in the practice of assembling or evaluating consumer credit information or
other information on consumers for the purpose of furnishing credit reports to
third parties, but does not include any governmental agency whose records are
maintained primarily for law enforcement or licensing purposes.

"Credit report" means any written,
oral, or other communication of any credit information by a consumer reporting
agency, as defined in the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act, which operates or
maintains a database of consumer credit information bearing on a consumer's
credit worthiness, credit standing, or credit capacity.

"Identity theft" means the
unauthorized use of another person's identifying information to obtain credit,
goods, services, money, or property.

"Security freeze" means a notice
placed in a credit report, at the request of the consumer who is a victim of
identity theft. [L 2006, c 138, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next